test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-4lex_manuttep_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - mánuttep: # ok
    mánuttep+N+Sg+Nom: mánuttep
    mánuttep+N+Sg+Gen: mánutteve
    mánuttep+N+Sg+Acc: mánutteve
    mánuttep+N+Sg+Ill: mánuttiäpán
    mánuttep+N+Sg+Loc: mánutteeveest
    mánuttep+N+Sg+Com: mánutteevijn
    mánuttep+N+Sg+Abe: mánuttevettáá
    mánuttep+N+Ess: mánutteppen
    mánuttep+N+Par: mánuttepped
    mánuttep+N+Pl+Nom: mánutteveh
    mánuttep+N+Pl+Gen: mánuttevij
    mánuttep+N+Pl+Acc: mánuttevijd
    mánuttep+N+Pl+Ill: mánutteevijd
    mánuttep+N+Pl+Loc: mánuttevijn
    mánuttep+N+Pl+Com: [mánuttevijguin, mánuttevijgijn]
    mánuttep+N+Pl+Abe: mánuttevijttáá

  Noun - kejâttep: # ok
    kejâttep+N+Sg+Nom: kejâttep
    kejâttep+N+Sg+Gen: kejâtteve
    kejâttep+N+Sg+Acc: kejâtteve
    kejâttep+N+Sg+Ill: kejâttiäpán
    kejâttep+N+Sg+Loc: kejâtteeveest
    kejâttep+N+Sg+Com: kejâtteevijn
    kejâttep+N+Sg+Abe: kejâttevettáá
    kejâttep+N+Ess: kejâtteppen
    kejâttep+N+Par: kejâttepped
    kejâttep+N+Pl+Nom: kejâtteveh
    kejâttep+N+Pl+Gen: kejâttevij
    kejâttep+N+Pl+Acc: kejâttevijd
    kejâttep+N+Pl+Ill: kejâtteevijd
    kejâttep+N+Pl+Loc: kejâttevijn
    kejâttep+N+Pl+Com: [kejâttevijguin, kejâttevijgijn]
    kejâttep+N+Pl+Abe: kejâttevijttáá
